New York, session 2025-2026, S8298.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Paragraph (a) of subdivision 8 of section 190.30 of the 2 criminal procedure law, as added by chapter 279 of the laws of 2008, is 3 amended to read as follows: 4 (a) A business record as defined in rule forty-five hundred eighteen 5 of the civil practice law and rules generated by a business entity may 6 be received in such grand jury proceedings as evidence [of the following 7 facts and similar facts stated therein: 8 (i) a person's use of, subscription to and charges and payments for 9 communication equipment and services including but not limited to equip- 10 ment or services provided by telephone companies and internet service 11 providers, but not including recorded conversations or images communi- 12 cated thereby; and 13 (ii) financial transactions, and a person's ownership or possessory 14 interest in any account, at a bank, insurance company, brokerage, 15 exchange or banking organization as defined in section two of the bank- 16 ing law]. 17 § 2. Paragraph (c) of subdivision 8 of section 190.30 of the criminal 18 procedure law, as added by chapter 279 of the laws of 2008, is amended 19 to read as follows: 20 (c) Any business record offered to a grand jury pursuant to paragraph 21 (a) of this subdivision that includes material [beyond that described in 22 such paragraph (a)] outside the scope of the business record as regular- 23 ly generated shall be redacted to exclude such additional material, or 24 received subject to a limiting instruction that the grand jury shall not 25 consider such additional material in support of any criminal charge. 26 § 3. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD10861-01-5